Washington statutes.
RCW 43.235.030

Domestic violence fatality review panels—Composition—Reports.

(1) Regional domestic violence fatality review panels may include, as appropriate, the following:

(a) Medical personnel with expertise in domestic violence abuse;

(b) Coroners or medical examiners or others experienced in the field of forensic pathology, if available;

(c) County prosecuting attorneys or municipal attorneys;

(d) Domestic violence shelter service staff or domestic violence victims' advocates;

(e) Law enforcement personnel;

(f) Local health department staff;

(g) Child protective services workers;

(h) Community corrections professionals;

(i) Perpetrator treatment program provider;

(j) School teachers, guidance counselors, or student health services staff; and

(k) Judges, court administrators, and/or their representatives.

(2) Regional domestic violence fatality review panels may also invite other relevant persons to serve on an ad hoc basis and participate as full members of the review panel for a particular review. These persons may include, but are not limited to:

(a) Individuals with particular expertise helpful to the regional review panel;

(b) Representatives of organizations or agencies that had contact with or provided services to the homicide victim or to the alleged perpetrator.

(3) The regional review panels shall make periodic reports to the coordinating entity and shall make a final report to the coordinating entity with regard to every fatality that is reviewed.

(4) Statewide issue-specific panels must include persons with particular subject matter expertise helpful to the panel. The statewide issue-specific review panels must make periodic reports to the coordinating entity and must make a final report to the coordinating entity for every fatality that is reviewed.

[ 2011 c 105 s 2; 2000 c 50 s 3.]